Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1619HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 473 Section 1. Section 321I.10, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Notwithstanding any other provision 3 of law to the contrary, a registered all-terrain vehicle or 4 off-road utility vehicle may be operated on a public hunting 5 area, as defined in section 481A.123, subsection 4, for the 6 express purpose of transporting a lawfully taken deer carcass 7 out of the public hunting area. Any operator or passenger of 8 the all-terrain vehicle or off-road utility vehicle on the 9 vehicle pursuant to this subsection must wear apparel described 10 in section 481A.122, subsection 1, until the deer carcass has 11 been transported out of the public hunting area. 12